Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,285
Cumulative successor asbestos-related
liabilities of successor corporation; limitations; applicability.

(1) The limitations in
section 25-21,286 shall apply to any successor corporation.

(2) The limitations in
section 25-21,286 shall not apply to:

(a) Workers' compensation benefits paid by or on behalf
of an employer to an employee under the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act
or a comparable workers' compensation law of another jurisdiction;

(b) Any claim against
a successor corporation that does not constitute a successor asbestos-related
liability;

(c)
Any obligation under the National Labor Relations Act, 29 U.S.C. 151, et seq.,
as amended, or under any collective-bargaining agreement; or

(d) A successor corporation
that, after a merger or consolidation, continued in the business of mining
asbestos or in the business of selling or distributing asbestos fibers or
in the business of manufacturing, distributing, removing, or installing asbestos-containing
products which were the same or substantially the same as those products previously
manufactured, distributed, removed, or installed by the transferor.

Laws 2010, LB763, § 3.

Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act, see section 48-1,110.